Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3212
Title subject to rights-of-way, easements, covenants, and rights of redemption.

(1) The title to any real estate which shall vest in the authority under the Land Reutilization Act shall be held by the authority in trust for the tax bill owners and taxing authorities having an interest in any tax liens which were foreclosed, as their interests may appear in the judgment of foreclosure.

(2) The title to any real estate which shall vest in any purchaser or the authority upon confirmation of such sale by the court shall be an absolute estate in fee simple, subject to rights-of-way, easements, and covenants thereon and subject to all rights of redemption provided by law or the Constitution.

Laws 1973, LB 73, § 12;

Laws 2008, LB710, § 5.